Louisiana, session 2026, HB853.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:391 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§391. Solicitations; misleading governmental appearance prohibited; misleading
connections to the secretary of state prohibited; disclaimer; penalty
A. A solicitation by a nongovernmental entity, for the purchase of or
payment for a product or service, which is in the form of and reasonably could be
interpreted or construed as a bill, invoice, or statement of account due, but
constitutes, in fact, a solicitation for the order by the addressee of goods or services,
or both, shall not contain any material which qualifies as a misleading solicitation
if it meets any of the following criteria:
(1) Reasonably could be interpreted or construed as falsely implying any
Louisiana local, state, or federal government connection, approval, or endorsement
through the use of a seal, insignia, or name of a state government agency,
department, commission, or program, or a citation to a state statute or federal law.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 853 ENROLLED
(2) Contains any reference to or a citation to a state statute or federal code
that misrepresents either the identity of the mailer or the protection or status afforded
such matter by the Louisiana state government any government entity.
(3) Reasonably could be construed by a business registered with the
secretary of state as implying any connection with the secretary of state or requiring
payment or additional action to remain in good standing as a business registered with
the secretary of state.
(4) Contains phrases such as "final notice", "immediate response requested",
"official notification", or any similar language, unless the individual or entity has an
existing business relationship with the solicitee.
(5) Contains an offer for goods and services that results in a subscription
service, automatic renewal, or continuous service that is not clearly and
conspicuously disclosed within the communication to the consumer.
B. In addition to the provisions of Subsection A of this Section, each If
considered a misleading solicitation pursuant to Subsection A of this Section, the
solicitation will be subject to the following requirements:
(1) Each solicitation shall bear on its face, at the beginning, in conspicuous
and legible type which is not smaller than fourteen-point font and is in contrast by
typography, layout, or color with any other printing on the solicitation, the following
disclaimer:
"THIS IS A SOLICITATION FOR THE ORDER OF GOODS OR
SERVICES, OR BOTH, AND NOT A BILL, INVOICE, OR STATEMENT OF
ACCOUNT DUE. YOU ARE UNDER NO OBLIGATION TO MAKE ANY
PAYMENTS ON ACCOUNT OF THIS OFFER UNLESS YOU ACCEPT THIS
OFFER. THIS PRODUCT OR SERVICE HAS NOT BEEN APPROVED OR
ENDORSED BY ANY LOUISIANA STATE GOVERNMENT AGENCY, AND
THIS OFFER IS NOT BEING MADE BY AN AGENCY OF THE LOUISIANA
STATE GOVERNMENT."
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 853 ENROLLED
(2) Each such solicitation shall bear, on the outer envelope, if one exists, in
conspicuous and legible type, which is not smaller than fourteen-point black font, the
following disclaimer:
"THIS IS NOT A GOVERNMENT ENTITY."
(3) Each such solicitation that utilizes a subscription, automatic renewal, or
continuous service shall include the following disclaimer in conspicuous and legible
type which is not smaller than fourteen-point black font:
"THE PAYMENT OR ACCEPTANCE OF THESE GOODS OR SERVICES
WILL RESULT IN AUTOMATIC WITHDRAWALS FROM ASSOCIATED
BANK ACCOUNTS OR PERIODIC BILLING."
C. Any misleading solicitation in violation of this Section Subsection B of
this Section shall subject the violator to a civil fine of not more than one thousand
dollars per violation in each solicitation. The attorney general shall bring
proceedings to recover all fines due pursuant to this Section. The remedies and
penalties provided in this Section shall be cumulative to all other remedies and
penalties provided by law.
D. Whoever violates Subsection B of this Section may be liable to the
solicitee for civil damages in the amount of three times his losses, plus reasonable
attorney fees and costs pursuant to the Louisiana Unfair Trade Practices and
Consumer Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401 et seq.
E. Each violation of this Section constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or
practice in trade or commerce for purposes of R.S. 51:1401, et seq., and shall subject
the violator to all actions, remedies, and penalties therein.
F. This Section shall not apply to the following:
(1) A bank, trust company, savings and loan association, savings bank, credit
union, finance or credit company, or any subsidiary or affiliate of these.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 853 ENROLLED
(2) An insurer licensed pursuant to Title 22 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950.
(3) A licensed motor vehicle dealer as defined in Title 32 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.